public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
je/T4
jòto/T0T4
siñor/B0mfv0
kaxo/T0v0&0(0<0<1
ŧitade/T0T4Y0
luxe/D0T4&0
stradon/C0U0
ufico/T0
libertà/T4
inportanŧa/D0T2
fegura/D0R0&0(0<0<1
kan/D0U0&0(0
efèto/T0I0
kosienŧa/D0T2
anemalon/D0T2U0
sienŧa/D0T2:0
dente/R0T0I0[0]0<0<1
tenŧion/D0T2U0
títol/T0T2u0
fenòmen/T0u0
Đòba/T4
Đòbia/T4
Đenèr/T4
Luɉo/T4
istadèla/D0T2
insutil/D0T3
autunal/D0T3U0
autonal/D0T3U0
otunal/D0T3U0
farnimal/D0T3U0
fraimal/D0T3U0
frimal/D0T3U0
ibernal/D0T3U0
Ŧeriòla/T4
diferenŧa/D0T2-0
kontròl/T0U0
oríxen/D0u0
órden/D0mfu0+0
faŧo/T0T2
ŧiel/T0T4U0
lèto/B0I0T4
braŧolin/T0
braŧo/T0T2I0
pòpol/T0T2u0
libro/B0v0&0
fiola/D0T2<0<1
ƚogo/T0
létara/D0T4
sèkol/T0T2u0
prinsipio/T0
produŧion/D0T2U0
đeneral/C0U0W0T4§0
sorixo/T0I0
operaŧion/D0T2U0
prado/T0v0&0
val/D0T3u0
artíkol/T0T2u0
ofesial/D0T3U0
ofisial/D0T3U0
atimo/T0
intenŧion/D0T2U0
kortígol/T0T2u0
kortívol/T0T2u0
vestío/T0<0<1
arte/R0T0
palaŧo/R0T0I0T1&0
palaso/R0T0I0T1&0
paƚaso/R0T0T1&0
đornada/D0Y0T4
xèr/T0
ŧentenèr/B0T4V0
úñol/T0T2u0
mèdo/T0v0&0
mèđo/T0v0&0
mèxo/T0v0&0
mèda/D0v0&0
mèđa/D0v0&0
mèxa/D0v0&0
mixo/T0
stanŧa/D0T2,0
stanŧon/D0T2U0
kolor/D0R0mf
koƚor/D0R0mf
viajo/T0T2
đornal/D0R0U0T4
automòbil/D0T3
personaxo/T0
parsonajo/T0T2
ben/C0u0
fiumexèl/T0T2U0
ƚavreto/T0mf
perígol/T0T2u0
despoxiŧion/D0T2U0
saxon/D0U0
justiŧia/D0T2T4
sòn/T0T1&0
speal/D0T3U0
mèrito/T0
elo/T0T2
kuel/T0mfu0
kual/T0T2u0
oñun/C0U0
negun/C0U0
ŧoè/T4	po:conjunction al:ŧovè
sol/T0T2W0u0
pal/T0u0&0(0
del/B0u0
grando/T0I0T1&0=0)0
píkol/T0T2u0=0
ŧítimo/B0T4
kondisional/D0T3U0
kaxo/T0R0v0I0’0&0(0[0]0<0<1
koraɉo/T0r2
bèl/T0U0=0&0
posíbel/D0T3u0-0
posíbol/D0T3u0-0
pien/C0W0u0(0
bianka/D0v0&0
biankiŧo/T0T2I0
đal/T0u0&0
krèmexe/T0
maron/C0U0
teriŧa/D0T2
turkinon/C0U0
ŧelèste/T0T4
vinòla/D0T2
real/D0T3U0&0-0
ofisial/D0T3U0
asoƚuto/T0
nasional/D0T3U0
fàsil/D0T3
prinsipal/D0T3U0W0
útil/D0T3+0-0
útel/D0T3u0+0-0
símil/D0T3
trankuila/D0T2
sosial/D0T3U0
internasional/D0T3U0
nadural/D0T3U0W0*0
ŧitadin/C0T4
industrial/D0T3U0
moral/D0T3U0
speŧial/D0U0W0
ʼéa/F0F1F2J0N0
ʼéi/L0N0
ʼéu/O0
ʼíu/O0
ʼvéa/F0F1F2J0N0
ʼvéi/L0N0
ʼvéu/O0
ʼvíu/O0
àtu/M0.0
gatu/M0.0
maƚedixarò/b0b2n0n2J0
porà/F0F1F2J0L0
poré/N0
porí/N0
poría/F0F1F2J0L0
poríatu/M0
poresi/N0
poresiu/O0
porié/N0
poriéu/O0
porisié/N0
porisiéu/O0
vòtu/M0‘0.0
vò-tu/M0‘0.0
vutu/M0‘0.0
vu-tu/M0‘0.0
malvosudo/T0Y0
kontrasto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
osto/a0E0E1E2I0J0v0
vàoe/a0a1a2K0.0
vatu/M0.0
interveñerò/b0b1b2J0
paròƚoe/a0a2K0
malsento/d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0
méter/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0^0+0.0,0@0
prometo/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0-0:0
oltrepàsoe/a0a1a2K0
portar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0=0-0.0,0@0:0
apartèño/a0E0E1E2I0J0
susteño/a0d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0
tratéñoe/a0a1a2K0
riuso/d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0
kordar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0+0-0*0.0@0
komensar/a0a1a2E0E1E2v0*0
komensiar/a0a1a2E0E1E2v0-0*0
respóndoe/a0a1a2K0
petar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0s0s1+0*0
sarar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0-0
koro/a0E0E1E2I0J0v0=0+0-0*0.0,0:0
perkorarò/b0b1b2J0
durar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0
písoe/a0a1a2K0-0*0
đúroe/a0a1K0T4
strenxarò/b0b1b2J0.0@0:0
arbandónoe/a0a1a2K0
temarò/b0b1b2J0
salútoe/a0a1K0
àudo/E0E1E2I0J0L0
audiso/E0E1E2I0J0L0
komandar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0.0
estendarò/b0b1b2J0
inténdoe/a0a1a2K0
kuèrxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0*0
sèrvoe/a0a1a2K0.0,0@0
ƚigar/a0a2E0E2r0+0
tràtoe/a0a1a2K0.0:0
sèrvo/a0d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0@0,0.0:0
exístoe/a0a1a2K0
dariderò/b0b1b2J0
mañar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0=0*0
dormenŧar/a0a1E0E1r0-0
péndoe/a0a1a2K0-0,0
reaƚixo/a0E0E2J0
mòver/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0*0.0
reŧévoe/a0a1K0
konto/a0E0E1E2I0J0R0*0§0
kanbio/a0E0E1E2I0J0R0r0*0.0
ƚíberoe/a0a2K0,0
sovertiso/E0E1E2I0J0L0
subvertiso/E0E1E2I0J0L0
ravòlxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
spređúdegoe/a0a1K0
vesinar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0
bàter/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0-0*0.0,0:0
taɉusar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0*0
taɉuŧar/a0a1E0E1r0*0
parar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0s0s1^0+0-0*0.0:0
kànpoe/a0a1a2K0*0,0
ƚontanar/a0a2E0E2r0
dexlontano/a0E0E1E2I0J0
partèŧipoe/a0a1K0
akòrđer/b0b1E0E1r0-0
tirar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0+0*0.0
konòto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
đóntoe/a0a1K0T4
inđóntoe/a0a1K0T4
portar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0=0-0.0,0@0:0
kontrapéxoe/a0a1a2K0
piando/a0E0E1I0J0
eƚèvoe/a0a2K0
kréser/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0.0,0:0
đoar/a0a1E0E1T4
đogàtoe/a0a1K0T4
asístoe/a0a1a2K0
konsisto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
komensiar/a0a1a2E0E1E2v0-0*0
fondar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0v0*0
fumo/a0E0E1E2I0J0=0*0
perfúmoe/a0a1a2K0
ŧèlebroe/a0a1K0T4
